New York, session 2025-2026, A1689.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The county law is amended by adding a new section 702-b to 2 read as follows: 3 § 702-b. Appointment of assistant district attorneys for animal 4 crimes. The district attorney in each county shall appoint at least one 5 assistant district attorney to be responsible for overseeing the prose- 6 cution of animal crimes, including, but not limited to, animal crimes 7 committed in violation of article twenty-six of the agriculture and 8 markets law. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03928-01-5